Massachusetts, session 194th, S1350.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
An Act for a Bridge Employment Training Program (BET).
Whereas, it is in the interests of sound economy, for the individuals, businesses, and
organizations of Massachusetts, that well-trained individuals have appropriate skills, and are
matched to productive employment. This legislation has been devised, in order to specify, and
expand, all reasonable opportunities.
of 2

1.) The Executive Office of Labor and Workforce Development (EOLWD), is hereby
authorized to develop a Bridge Employment Training Program (BET), for residents of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
2.) Individuals authorized to participate in this program, shall be individuals determined
to be employable, and/or who have lost their employment, within at least six weeks, or more.
3.) The Department is authorized to devise Independent Employment Training Contracts
(IETC) to stipulate agreed-upon training programs, for up to two years, with specified
requirements, which shall be matched with available positions in the Commonwealth, in private,
non-profit, and/or public employment.
4.) The goal of this bill, is to accomplish, as far as is practicable, that all individuals may
have access to Employable Skills Training (EST) to improve their economic lives, and the
benefit of our Commonwealth, as a whole.
5.) The Department shall be innovative in creating these options, coordinating private,
non-profit, and public resources, including, but not limited to, suitable consultation with Human
Resource professionals, and diverse in all respects of being non-discriminatory.
of 2